District of Columbia statutes.
15-366

Procedure for recognition of foreign-country judgment.

(a)

If recognition of a foreign-country judgment is sought as an original matter, the issue of recognition shall be raised by filing an action seeking recognition of the foreign-country judgment.

(b)

If recognition of a foreign-country judgment is sought in a pending action, the issue of recognition may be raised by counterclaim, cross-claim, or affirmative defense.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
This section is referenced in § 15-367.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 6 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.